Illinois, session 104th, SB1972.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Medical Patient Rights Act is amended by 5adding Section 8 as follows: 6    (410 ILCS 50/8 new)7    Sec. 8. Missed and late appointment fees.8    (a) As used in this Section, "health care provider" means 9any individual licensed under the laws of this State to 10provide health services, including, but not limited to, 11dentists licensed under the Illinois Dental Practice Act; 12dental hygienists licensed under the Illinois Dental Practice 13Act; licensed practical nurses, registered nurses, and 14advanced practice registered nurses licensed under the Nurse 15Practice Act; occupational therapists licensed under the 16Illinois Occupational Therapy Practice Act; optometrists 17licensed under the Illinois Optometric Practice Act of 1987; 18pharmacists licensed under the Pharmacy Practice Act; physical 19therapists licensed under the Illinois Physical Therapy Act; 20physicians licensed under the Medical Practice Act of 1987; 21physician assistants licensed under the Physician Assistant 22Practice Act of 1987; podiatric physicians licensed under the 23Podiatric Medical Practice Act of 1987; clinical psychologists   SB1972- 2 -LRB104 09002 AAS 19058 b1licensed under the Clinical Psychologist Licensing Act; 2clinical social workers licensed under the Clinical Social 3Work and Social Work Practice Act; speech-language 4pathologists and audiologists licensed under the Illinois 5Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology Practice Act; or 6hearing instrument dispensers licensed under the Hearing 7Instrument Consumer Protection Act, or any of their successor 8Acts.9    (b) Except as otherwise required by law, health care 10providers shall not charge a patient or require the patient to 11pay a fee for a missed or late appointment.12    (c) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to prohibit 13health care providers from developing and implementing an 14incentive program to encourage patients to adhere to scheduled 15appointments.16    (d) Any health care provider that violates this Section is 17guilty of a petty offense and shall be fined $500 per 18violation. 19    Section 10. The Veterinary Medicine and Surgery Practice 20Act of 2004 is amended by adding Section 14.3 as follows: 21    (225 ILCS 115/14.3 new)22    Sec. 14.3. Missed and late appointment fees.23    (a) Except as otherwise required by law, a person engaged 24in the practice of veterinary medicine shall not charge a   SB1972- 3 -LRB104 09002 AAS 19058 b1client or require the client to pay a fee for a missed or late 2appointment.3    (b) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to prohibit 4a person engaged in the practice of veterinary medicine from 5developing and implementing an incentive program to encourage 6clients to adhere to scheduled appointments for veterinary 7medicine.8    (c) Any person engaged in the practice of veterinary 9medicine that violates this Section is guilty of a petty 10offense and shall be fined $500 per violation.